ja: タイヤ構造タイプ: バイアス; ラジアル; その他
lt-LT: Padangos konstrukcijos tipas: Įstrižinio kordų pynimo; Radialinė; Kita
th: ประเภทโครงสร้างของยางรถยนต์: ไบแอสพลาย; แบบรัศมี; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta konstrukcije pnevmatike: Diagonalna ploskev; Radialni; Druga
zh-TW: 輪胎結構類型: 斜交胎; 輻射層; 其他
ru: Тип конструкции шины: Диагональная; Радиальная; Другая
pt-BR: Tipo de construção do pneu: Lona cruzada; Radial; Outro
nb: Dekkkonstruksjonstype: Skrålag; Radial; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta izrade guma: Dijagonalni sloj; Radijalan; Ostalo
ko: 타이어 구조 유형: 바이어스; 방사형; 기타
it: Tipo di costruzione dello pneumatico: Diagonale; Radiale; Altro
zh-CN: 轮胎结构类型: 斜交; 子午线; 其他
tr: Lastik yapı tipi: Çapraz katlı; Radyal; Diğer
vi: Loại kết cấu lốp xe: Lốp bố chéo; Hình tia; Khác
de: Reifenkonstruktionstyp: Diagonal; Radial; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie pneumatiky: Diagonálna; Radiálna; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de construcție a anvelopei: Pliuri înclinate; Radial; Altele
sv: Typ av däckkonstruktion: Bias-ply; Radiell; Annat
pl: Typ konstrukcji opony: Diagonalne; Radialne; Inne
hu: Gumiabroncs szerkezeti típusa: Diagonális; Radiális; Egyéb
fi: Renkaan rakennetyyppi: Ristikudos; Säteittäinen; Muu
fr: Type de construction du pneu: Carcasse diagonale; Radial; Autre
nl: Type bandenconstructie: Diagonaalband; Radiaal; Overig
en: Tire construction type: Bias-ply; Radial; Other
cs: Typ provedení pneumatiky: Diagonální; Radiální; Jiné
es: Tipo de construcción del neumático: Capa diagonal; Radial; Otros
el: Τύπος κατασκευής ελαστικού: Διαγώνιας κατασκευής; Ακτινωτό; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на гумата: Диагонални гуми; Радиални; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de construção do pneu: Diagonal; Radial; Outro
da: Dækkonstruktionstype: Bias-ply; Radial; Andet